Massachusetts, session 194th, H4964.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 11 and 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws
or any general or special law to the contrary, the licensing authority in the town of South Hadley
may grant: (i) 4 additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the
premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138; and (ii) 2 additional licenses for the sale of
all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter
138.
(b) A license granted pursuant to clause (i) of subsection (a) shall only be exercised in the
dining room of a common victualler licensed to conduct a restaurant and other such public rooms
or areas as may be deemed reasonable and appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in
writing.
of 2

(c) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to
this section to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in
good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have
been paid.
(d) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all
legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the
licensing authority may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant
at the same location under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license
shall dissolve.
(e) A license granted under this section shall be issued within 1 year after the effective
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (c) and (d) thereafter.
SECTION 2. Upon issuance of the license authorized in clause (ii) of subsection (a) of
section 1, the licensee shall return physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and
restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority its license for the sale of wine and malt
beverages not to be drunk on the premises under section 15 of chapter 138 of the General Laws.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2